Massachusetts, session 194th, H2449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8C of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, are hereby amended by inserting the following new paragraph after line 46:
Any town, city or district with artificial fluoridation programs in effect can end those
programs with a local ordinance banning fluoridation via the local legislative body, i.e. City
Council, Town Meeting or Water Commissioners. That process is initiated by the presentation of
a petition of at least ten registered voters to the legislative body. Moreover, if the water
superintendent or water commissioners with responsibility for ensuring water safety determines
that in their opinion, the water fluoridation program is posing a risk to consumers, workers,
infrastructure or environment, they can suspend fluoridation programs at will.
of 1